Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-237
Town meeting; manner of voting.

When the result of any vote shall, upon such declaration, be questioned by one or more of the electors present, the presiding officer shall make the vote certain by causing the voters to rise and be counted, or by dividing off.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 35, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 1021;

C.S.1922, § 923;

C.S.1929, § 26-237;

R.S.1943, § 23-237;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 6.